Utah, session 2026, SB219.
Section 1. Section 72-7-510 is amended to read:72-7-510. Existing outdoor advertising not in conformity with part -- Procedure -- Eminent domain -- Compensation -- Relocation.(1)As used in this section, "nonconforming sign" means a sign that has been erected in a zone or area other than commercial or industrial or where outdoor advertising is not permitted under this part.(2)(a)The department may acquire by gift, purchase, agreement, exchange, or eminent domain, any existing outdoor advertising and all property rights pertaining to the outdoor advertising which were lawfully in existence on May 9, 1967, and which by reason of this part become nonconforming.(b)If the department, or any town, city, county, governmental entity, public utility, or any agency or the United States Department of Transportation under this part, prevents the maintenance as defined in Section 72-7-502, or requires that maintenance of an existing sign be discontinued, the sign in question shall be considered acquired by the entity and just compensation will become immediately due and payable.(c)Eminent domain shall be exercised in accordance with the provision of Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent Domain.(3)(a)Just compensation shall be paid for outdoor advertising and all property rights pertaining to the same, including the right of the landowner upon whose land a sign is located, acquired through the processes of eminent domain.(b)For the purposes of this part, just compensation shall include the consideration of damages to remaining properties, contiguous and noncontiguous, of an outdoor advertising sign company's interest, which remaining properties, together with the properties actually condemned, constituted an economic unit.(c)The department is empowered to remove signs found in violation of Section 72-7-508 without payment of any compensation.(4)Except as specifically provided in this section or Section 72-7-513, this part may not be construed to permit a person to place or maintain any outdoor advertising adjacent to any interstate or primary highway system which is prohibited by law or by any town, city, or county ordinance.  Any town, city, county, governmental entity, or public utility which requires the removal, relocation, alteration, change, or termination of outdoor advertising shall pay just compensation as defined in this part and in Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent Domain.(5)Except as provided in Section 72-7-508, no sign shall be required to be removed by the department nor sign maintenance as described in this section be discontinued unless at the time of removal or discontinuance there are sufficient funds, from whatever source, appropriated and immediately available to pay the just compensation required under this section and unless at that time the federal funds required to be contributed under 23 U.S.C., Sec. 131, if any, with respect to the outdoor advertising being removed, have been appropriated and are immediately available to this state.(6)(a)If any outdoor advertising use, structure, or permit may not be continued because of the widening, construction, or reconstruction along an interstate, federal aid primary highway existing as of June 1, 1991, or national highway systems highway, the owner shall have the option to relocate and remodel the use, structure, or permit to another location:(i)within the same municipality or unincorporated county:(A)on the same property;(B)on adjacent property;(C)on either side of the same highway; or(D)mutually agreed upon by the owner and the county or municipality in which the use, structure, or permit is located; or(ii)within a different municipality or unincorporated county mutually agreed upon by the owner and the different municipality or county.(b)The relocation under Subsection (6)(a) shall be in a commercial or industrial zoned area or where outdoor advertising is permitted under this part.(c)The county or municipality in which the use or structure is located or is to be relocated as described in Subsection (6)(a) or (6)(d) shall, if necessary, provide for the relocation and remodeling by ordinance for a special exception to its zoning ordinance.(d)The relocated and remodeled use or structure may be:(i)erected to a height and angle to make it clearly visible to traffic on the main-traveled way of the highway to which it is relocated or remodeled;(ii)the same size and at least the same height as the previous use or structure, but the relocated use or structure may not exceed the size and height permitted under this part;(iii)relocated to a comparable vehicular traffic count.(d)The owner of a relocated or remodeled use or structure may elect to relocate or remodel the use or structure with one or more of the following characteristics:(i)(A)erected to a height up to 65 feet above the ground;(B)erected to a height of more than 65 feet above the ground in order to make the entire advertising content clearly visible on the main-traveled way of the highway to which the structure is relocated or remodeled; or(C)erected to the same height as the previous use or structure;(ii)the same size as the previous use or structure, except that the relocated or remodeled use or structure may not exceed the size permitted under this part; or(iii)relocated to a location with a comparable vehicular traffic count.(e)For a relocated or remodeled use or structure described in this Subsection (6), the height restrictions described in Subsection 72-7-505(2) do not apply.(7)(a)The governmental entity, quasi-governmental entity, or public utility that causes the need for the outdoor advertising relocation or remodeling as provided in Subsection (6)(a) shall pay the costs related to the relocation, remodeling, or acquisition.(b)If a governmental entity prohibits the relocation andor remodeling as provided in Subsection (6)(a)(i), it(6)(a) and (6)(d), the government entity shall pay just compensation as provided in Subsection (3).(c)If an owner of a use, structure, or permit affected by widening, construction, or reconstruction as described in Subsection (6)(a) makes a written request to the municipality or county for approval to relocate or remodel the use or structure as described in Subsection (6), the owner may take the requested action, without further municipal or county approval, 30 days after the day on which the structure or use owner makes the written request.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 72-7-510.5 is amended to read:72-7-510.5. Height adjustments for outdoor advertising signs.(1)If the view and readability of an outdoor advertising sign, including a sign that is a nonconforming sign as defined in Section 72-7-510, a noncomplying structure as defined in Sections 10-20-102 and 17-79-102, or a nonconforming use as defined in Sections 10-20-102 and 17-79-102 is obstructed due to a noise abatement or safety measure, grade change, construction, directional sign, highway widening, or aesthetic improvement made by an agency of this state, along an interstate, federal aid primary highway existing as of June 1, 1991, national highway systems highway, or state highway or by an improvement created on real property subsequent to the department's disposal of the property under Section 72-5-111, the owner of the sign may elect one or both of the following options:(a)adjust the height of the sign;existing or relocated sign:(i)up to 65 feet above the ground; or(ii)to a height more than 65 feet above the ground in order to make the entire advertising content of the sign clearly visible; or(b)relocate the sign as follows:(i)if the sign is located along an interstate, federal aid primary highway existing as of June 1, 1991, or national highway systems highway, relocate the sign to either side of the same highway, within the same municipality or unincorporated county, if the sign complies with the spacing requirements under Section 72-7-505 and is in a commercial or industrial zone;(c)(ii)if the sign is located along a state highway, relocate the sign to either side of the same highway, within the same municipality or unincorporated county, to a point within one mile of the sign's prior location, if the sign complies with the spacing requirements under Section 72-7-505 and is located in a commercial or industrial zone; or(d)(iii)relocate the sign to a location that is mutually agreed upon by the owner and:(i)(A)the same municipality or unincorporated county in which the obstructed sign is located; or(ii)(B)any other municipality or unincorporated county.(2)A height adjusted sign under this section does not constitute a substantial change to the sign.(3)The county or municipality in which the obstructed sign is located or is to be relocated shall, if necessary, provide for the height adjustment or relocation by ordinance for a special exception to its zoning ordinance.(4)(a)The height adjusted sign:(i)may be erected:(A)to a height to make the entire advertising content of the sign clearly visible; and(B)to an angle to make the entire advertising content of the sign clearly visible; and(ii)shall be the same size as the previous sign.(b)The provisions of Subsection (1)(a) and Subsection (4)(a) are an exceptionexceptions to the height requirements under Section 72-7-505.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect:(1)except as provided in Subsection (2), May 6, 2026; or(2)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(a)upon approval by the governor;(b)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(c)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.